Hawaii statutes.
§309-2 Eligibility. All students
meeting the requirements of and attending institutions meeting the
accreditation standards of Public Law 89-329 and Public Law 89-287 or similar
federal laws shall be eligible for loans guaranteed under this program. [L 1963,
c 90, pt of §1; am L 1965, c 141, §1; Supp, §44B-2; am L 1966, c 16, pt of §2;
HRS §309-2; am L 1968, c 49, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next